Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.220

Rendering emergency care—Immunity of physician or hospital from civil liability.

No physician or hospital licensed in this state shall be subject to civil liability, based solely upon failure to obtain consent in rendering emergency medical, surgical, hospital, or health services to any individual regardless of age where its patient is unable to give his or her consent for any reason and there is no other person reasonably available who is legally authorized to consent to the providing of such care: PROVIDED, That such physician or hospital has acted in good faith and without knowledge of facts negating consent.

[ 2011 c 336 s 497; 1971 ex.s. c 305 s 4.]

NOTES:

Immunity from liability for certain types of medical care: RCW 4.24.300.